Louisiana, session 2026, HB248.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 26 of Title 42 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 42:1481 through 1485, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 26. COMPENSATION COMMISSION
§1481. Compensation Commission; domicile; meetings; staffing
A. The Compensation Commission, hereafter referred to in this Chapter as
the "commission", is hereby created pursuant to Article X, Section 23.1 of the
Constitution of Louisiana.
B.(1) The commission shall meet at least once each quarter until it completes
a comprehensive examination and evaluation of the salary and other compensation
for each elected official whose salary or other compensation was established by
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-876 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 248
statute as of January 1, 2026, and establishes a new salary and other compensation
for each office or class of offices based upon its examination and evaluation.
(2) The commission shall establish a work schedule for its examination and
evaluation of the salary and other compensation of elected officials to ensure that it
is able to establish a new salary and other compensation for each office or class of
offices within its purview no later than January 15, 2037.
C. The commission shall be domiciled in Baton Rouge, Louisiana, as an
independent office within the legislative auditor's office. The legislative auditor
shall provide staff support to the commission as requested and directed by the
commission.
§1482. Membership; qualifications; term of office; officers
A. The commission shall be composed of fifteen members who shall be
selected as follows:
(1) The governor shall appoint three members.
(2) The supreme court shall appoint one member.
(3) The Conference of Court of Appeal Judges shall appoint one member.
(4) The Louisiana District Judges Association shall appoint one member.
(5) The Louisiana District Attorneys Association shall appoint one member.
(6) The Louisiana Sheriffs' Association shall appoint one member.
(7) The Louisiana Clerks of Court Association shall appoint one member.
(8) The Louisiana State Coroner's Association shall appoint one member.
(9) The Louisiana Assessors' Association shall appoint one member.
(10) The speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint one member.
(11) The member of the House of Representatives who is the chairman of the
largest caucus or delegation of members of a political party with which the speaker
of the House is not affiliated shall appoint one member.
(12) The president of the Senate shall appoint one member.
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-876 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 248
(13) The member of the Senate who is the chairman of the largest caucus or
delegation of members of a political party with which the president of the Senate is
not affiliated shall appoint one member.
B. All appointments to the commission shall be made from a list of qualified
nominees submitted by the presidents of the accredited nonprofit private institutions
of higher education domiciled in the state who shall constitute the nominating
committee. The nominating committee shall timely submit the names of no fewer
than five different eligible nominees for each position to each appointing authority
listed in Subsection A of this Section. In the case of a vacancy, the nominating
committee shall timely submit the names of no fewer than five different eligible
nominees for the vacant position to the appropriate appointing authority. In
preparing the list of nominees, the nominating committee shall give due
consideration to the demographics of the population of the state, including without
limitation geography, gender, and race.
C. Each person nominated to serve on the commission shall be a qualified
elector of this state and shall not be a lobbyist or an employee of a lobbyist, a public
employee, an elected public official, or an appointed public official other than as a
member of the commission.
D. Members of the commission shall serve one ten-year term and vacancies
shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment. A member of the
commission may be removed for cause by a majority vote of the membership of the
commission.
E. The member selected by the supreme court shall call the first meeting of
the commission. At the first meeting, the commission shall elect a chairman and any
other officers its deems necessary from among its members.
§1483. Commission members; compensation prohibited; expenses
Members of the commission shall not receive compensation for their
services, but may be reimbursed actual expenses incurred in the performance of their
duties as members of the commission.
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-876 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 248
§1484. Duties and functions
A. The commission shall conduct a comprehensive examination and
evaluation of the salary and other compensation for each elected official whose
salary or other compensation was established by statute as of January 1, 2026,
including statewide elected officials, Public Service Commissioners, judges, district
attorneys, sheriffs, coroners, clerks of court, tax assessors, and members of the
legislature.
B. The commission shall publish its compensation recommendation for an
office no later than January fifteenth of the last full calendar year of a term of office
for that office or class of offices following its evaluation of the salary and other
compensation for that office or class of offices. The change in salary and other
compensation shall become effective at the beginning of the subsequent term of
office for that office. In the case of a class of offices with staggered terms, the
change in compensation for that entire class of offices shall become effective at the
beginning of first term of an office within the class following the establishment of
the salary or other compensation. Any provision of law conflicting with the change
in salary and other compensation established by commission shall be null and of no
effect.
C. All departments, agencies, and officials of the state and of political
subdivisions of the state shall cooperate in furnishing to the commission such
information and assistance as the commission deems necessary to discharge its
duties.
§1485. Termination
The commission shall terminate on January 15, 2037, or when it notifies the
legislature that it has completed its duty, whichever is earlier.
Section 2. This Act shall take effect and become operative if and when the proposed
amendment of Article X of the Constitution of Louisiana contained in the Act which
originated as House Bill No. of this 2026 Regular Session of the Legislature is adopted
at a statewide election and becomes effective.
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-876 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 248